Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 5 Administration of Assets Generally

23-2-90.
Legal and equitable assets defined; rules of distribution.

Assets are either legal or equitable. Legal assets are such as may be reached by the ordinary process of law. Equitable assets are such as can be reached only through the intervention of equity.

Legal assets, when properly before the court, shall be distributed according to legal liens and priorities. Equitable assets shall be distributed according to justice and right in the particular case, the general rule being that equality is equity.

Sometimes assets are partly legal and partly equitable. In such cases, while the above rule shall be adhered to as to the legal assets, equity shall so administer the equitable assets as to produce general equality.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 3073, 3074; Code 1868, §§ 3085, 3086; Code 1873, §§ 3142, 3143; Code 1882, §§ 3142, 3143; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3997, 3998; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4594, 4595; Code 1933, §§ 37-401, 37-402.

23-2-91.
When equity will interfere with administration of estates.

Equity will not interfere with the regular administration of estates, except upon:

Application of the representative:

For construction and direction; or

For marshaling the assets; or

Application of any person interested in the estate where there is danger of loss or other injury to his interests.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3075; Code 1868, § 3087; Code 1873, § 3144; Code 1882, § 3144; Civil Code 1895, § 3999; Civil Code 1910, § 4596; Code 1933, § 37-403.

Law reviews.

For article, “Fiduciary Problems of the Executor and Trustee: Conflicts of Interest, Violations of Fiduciary Duties; Surcharge, and Other Remedies of Beneficiaries,” see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 187 (1972).

For survey article on wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (2006).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2007).

23-2-92.
Application for direction or construction of will.

In cases of difficulty in construing wills, in distributing estates, in ascertaining the persons entitled, or in determining under what law property should be divided, the representative may ask the direction of the court, but not on imaginary difficulties or from excessive caution.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3076; Code 1868, § 3088; Code 1873, § 3145; Code 1882, § 3145; Civil Code 1895, § 4000; Civil Code 1910, § 4597; Code 1933, § 37-404.

Law reviews.

For note, “Determining Principal and Income Allocation in Georgia Trusts,” see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 564 (1972).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

23-2-93.
Marshaling assets of decedent’s estate.

In all cases where legal difficulties arise as to the distribution of assets in payment of debts or where from any circumstances the ordinary process of law would interfere with the due administration of an estate, without fault on the part of the representative of the estate, a petition to marshal the assets shall be maintained at the instance of the representative.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3077; Code 1868, § 3089; Code 1873, § 3146; Code 1882, § 3146; Civil Code 1895, § 4001; Civil Code 1910, § 4598; Code 1933, § 37-405.

23-2-94.
Compelled election in marshaling assets.

In marshaling assets, the court shall look to the equities of the creditors and, where cases arise for election, shall compel the parties to elect.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3078; Code 1868, § 3090; Code 1873, § 3147; Code 1882, § 3147; Civil Code 1895, § 4002; Civil Code 1910, § 4599; Code 1933, § 37-406.

23-2-95.
Creditors’ petitions.

Creditors’ petitions may be filed at the instance of any creditor, the privilege being extended to all to appear and become parties within a reasonable time.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3079; Code 1868, § 3091; Code 1873, § 3148; Code 1882, § 3148; Civil Code 1895, § 4003; Civil Code 1910, § 4600; Code 1933, § 37-407.

23-2-96.
When equitable assets may be reached by creditor.

Equitable assets may be reached by a creditor in every case where he shows that there is danger of not being satisfied out of legal assets.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3084; Code 1868, § 3096; Code 1873, § 3153; Code 1882, § 3153; Civil Code 1895, § 4004; Civil Code 1910, § 4601; Code 1933, § 37-408.

Law reviews.

For note, “Georgia Becomes A Quasi Community Property State,” see 17 Ga. St. B.J. 134 (1981).

For comment, “The Georgia Supreme Court’s Creation of an Equitable Interest in Marital Property — Yours? Mine? Ours!,” see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 449 (1982).

For article, “Retirement Benefits: Protection from Creditors’ Claims,” see 24 Ga. St. B.J. 118 (1988).

23-2-97.
Time limit for intervention in case disposing of assets; publication of order.

In all equity cases in which assets of either or both parties are being administered, marshaled, or otherwise disposed of by the court, upon motion of either party or of the court at least 60 days before the term for trial, an order shall be passed bearing the title of the case and addressed to all persons concerned, requiring all persons claiming an interest in the assets to intervene in the case by not later than a certain date to be fixed by the court. The date shall be not less than 60 days nor more than 90 days from the date on which the order is filed. After filing, the order shall be published twice each month for two consecutive months in the official organ for legal advertisements in the county in which the case is pending.

After the passage of the last date for intervention fixed in the published order, no person interested in the assets of the case shall be allowed to intervene.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 344, §§ 1, 2.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the problems with acquiring good title, see 15 Ga. B.J. 281 (1953).

23-2-98.
Application of joint and individual assets to debts.

Joint assets shall be applied to joint debts, and individual assets to individual debts; but, when the joint assets are exhausted, the joint debts may come upon individual assets, the individual debts, without regard to relative dignity as compared with the joint debts, being first advanced the pro rata amount received on the joint debts from joint assets.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3085; Code 1868, § 3097; Code 1873, § 3154; Code 1882, § 3154; Civil Code 1895, § 4005; Civil Code 1910, § 4602; Code 1933, § 37-409.